Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.068

[Art. 8] Apprehension of deserters.

Any civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, territory, commonwealth, or possession, or the District of Columbia may summarily apprehend a deserter from the state of Washington organized militia and deliver the offender into the custody of the state of Washington organized militia. If an offender is apprehended outside of the state of Washington, the return to the area must be in accordance with normal extradition procedures or reciprocal agreement.

[ 1989 c 48 s 8; 1963 c 220 s 8.]